test/src/morphology/noun-párra-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

Tests:
  Noun - ieddne: # 
    ieddne+N+Sg+Nom: ieddne 
    ieddne+N+Sg+Gen: iedne
    ieddne+N+Sg+Ill: æddnáj
    ieddne+N+Pl+Ill: iednijda
    ieddne+N+Ess: ieddnen
    

  Noun - goahte: # 
    goahte+N+Sg+Nom: goahte
    goahte+N+Sg+Acc: goadev
    goahte+N+Sg+Com: gådijn
    goahte+N+Ess: goahten

  Noun - jávrre: # 
    jávrre+N+Sg+Nom: jávrre 
    jávrre+N+Sg+Ill: jávrráj 

  Noun - áhkko: # 
    áhkko+N+Sg+Nom: áhkko 
    áhkko+N+Sg+Ine: áhkon 
    áhkko+N+Sg+Ill: áhkkuj
    
    
  Noun - irgge: # 
    irgge+N+Sg+Nom: irgge
    irgge+N+Sg+Acc: irggev
    irgge+N+Pl+Com: irggij
    irgge+N+Ess: irggen

  Noun - girkko: # 
    girkko+N+Sg+Nom: girkko 
    girkko+N+Sg+Gen: girkko 
    girkko+N+Sg+Ill: girkkuj
     

  Noun - muohtá: # 
    muohtá+N+Sg+Nom: muohtá 
    muohtá+N+Sg+Ine: muohtán 
    muohtá+N+Sg+Ill: muohtáj

  Noun - snjuktja: # 
    snjuktja+N+Sg+Nom: [snjuktja,sjnjuktja]
    snjuktja+N+Sg+Ine: [snjuvtjan,sjnjuvtjan]
    snjuktja+N+Sg+Ill: [snjuktjaj,sjnjuktjaj]
    

  Noun - bierjjedahka: # 
    bierjjedahka+N+Sg+Nom: bierjjedahka 
    bierjjedahka+N+Pl+Nom: bierjjedagá 
    bierjjedahka+N+Sg+Ill: bierjjedahkaj
    
